Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 10. Virginia Port Authority.

§ 62.1-128.
Authority created.

The Virginia Port Authority, hereinafter referred to as the Authority, is created as a body corporate and as a political subdivision of the Commonwealth. The Authority is hereby constituted a public instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental functions, and the exercise by the Authority of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential governmental function of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.1; 1952, c. 61; 1954, c. 667; 1958, c. 174; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 171; 1981, c. 589; 1997, c. 232.

Cross references.

As to the Virginia Port Authority’s conditional exemption from the Virginia Public Procurement Act, see §

2.2-4343

.

§ 62.1-129.
Board of Commissioners; members and officers; Executive Director; agents and employees.

All powers, rights, and duties conferred by this chapter, or other provisions of law, upon the Authority shall be exercised by the Board of Commissioners of the Virginia Port Authority, hereinafter referred to as the Board or Board of Commissioners. The Board shall consist of the State Treasurer, the Chief Executive Officer of the Virginia Economic Development Partnership, the Chief Executive Officer of the Virginia International Trade Corporation, and 11 members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. The terms of members of the Board of Commissioners appointed or reappointed by the Governor on or after January 1, 1981, shall be for five years. Any appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term. Members of the Board shall receive their expenses and shall be compensated at the rate provided in §

2.2-2813

for each day spent on business of the Board. No member appointed by the Governor shall be eligible to serve more than two successive terms. A person appointed to fill a vacancy may be appointed to serve two additional terms. Beginning with those members of the Board of Commissioners appointed or reappointed by the Governor on or after January 1, 1981: (i) appointments shall be made by the Governor in such a manner as to ensure the widest possible geographical representation of all parts of the Commonwealth, and (ii) no resident of the Cities of Chesapeake, Hampton, Newport News, Norfolk, Portsmouth, or Virginia Beach shall be eligible for appointment or reappointment to the Board of Commissioners if his appointment or reappointment would increase or maintain the number of members of the Board of Commissioners residing in such cities above the number of five. One of the members appointed or reappointed from the cities previously mentioned in this section shall be a resident of the City of Portsmouth or the City of Chesapeake, one of the members appointed or reappointed shall be a resident of the City of Norfolk or the City of Virginia Beach, one of the members appointed or reappointed shall be a resident of the City of Newport News or the City of Hampton, one of the members appointed or reappointed shall be a resident of Greater Hampton Roads, and one of the members appointed or reappointed shall be a resident of Greater Hampton Roads, but not a resident of any of the above-mentioned cities. Additionally, one member shall be appointed from the City of Richmond or the County of Chesterfield, Hanover, or Henrico to serve as a member representing the Port of Richmond, and one member shall be appointed from the City of Winchester or the County of Clarke, Frederick, or Warren to serve as a member representing the Virginia Inland Port. Of the members appointed by the Governor, all members shall have executive level experience in any of the following industries: agriculture, distribution and warehousing, manufacturing, logistics and transportation, mining, marketing, legal, financial, or transportation infrastructure. In addition, the Governor shall appoint at least one member with maritime shipping experience from a list of at least three nominees provided by the Virginia Maritime Association, who shall not be a paid member of the Virginia Maritime Association or have any other conflict of interest with the Virginia Port Authority.The Board shall elect from its membership a chairman and vice-chairman and may also elect from its membership, or appoint from its staff, a secretary and treasurer and prescribe their powers and duties.The Board of Commissioners shall appoint the chief executive officer of the Authority, who shall not be a member of the Board, who shall be known as the Executive Director and who shall serve at the pleasure of the Board. The Executive Director’s compensation from the Commonwealth shall be fixed by the Board in accordance with law. This compensation shall be established at a level which will enable the Authority to attract and retain a capable Executive Director.The Board may also appoint from the staff an assistant secretary and an assistant treasurer, who shall, in addition to other duties, discharge such functions of the secretary and treasurer, respectively, as may be directed by the Board.

The Board may, at its discretion and from time to time, also form a Maritime Advisory Council, consisting of representatives from the maritime industry, to provide advice and counsel to the Board of Commissioners on all matters associated with the Authority with the exception of the annual budget and personnel matters.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.2; 1952, c. 61; 1954, c. 667; 1956, c. 207; 1958, c. 174; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 171; 1978, c. 655; 1980, c. 728; 1981, c. 589; 1983, cc. 218, 298, 338; 1987, c. 688; 2012, cc. 846, 849; 2013, cc. 762, 794; 2014, c. 424; 2016, c. 749; 2017, cc. 801, 818.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 762 and 794, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall exercise all powers and authority granted to it pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

62.1-128

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia to ensure that all necessary and desirable changes, reforms, and reorganizations are promptly undertaken in order to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of operation of Virginia International Terminals, Inc., including but not limited to the elimination of duplicative and redundant services, personnel, and positions. The Authority shall report to the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly actions taken to implement this undertaking.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 846 and 849 are identical, and added the subsection A designator and subsection B; added the last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection A; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 762 and 794 are identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection A, inserted “the Chief Executive Officer of the Economic Development Partnership,” in the second sentence, substituted “four” for “three” at the end of the eighth sentence, added “and one of the members appointed or reappointed shall be a resident of Greater Hampton Roads, but not a resident of any of the above-mentioned cities” at the end of the ninth sentence, added the tenth sentence and made a related change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 424 in subsection A deleted “heretofore or hereafter” following “A person” in the seventh sentence, substituted “number of five” for “number of four” in the eighth sentence, inserted “one of the members appointed or reappointed shall be a resident of Greater Hampton Roads,” and added the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 749, effective April 1, 2017, inserted “the Chief Executive Officer of the Virginia International Trade Corporation” in the second sentence of the first paragraph in subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 801 and 818 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor” in the second sentence, deleted “nonvoting ex officio” preceding “member representing” in the tenth sentence, and substituted “in any” for “and represent one” in the eleventh sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995. —

The Virginia Port Authority, pursuant to § 56-557 [see now §

33.2-1800

], is the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 for any concession of Port facilities because the General Assembly has conferred on it alone the power to develop and/or operate Port facilities and, as a result, the Virginia Port Authority bears statutory responsibility to review and evaluate the proposals received by private entities for the concession of Port facilities, and to do so according to any guidelines adopted by it pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1 [see now §§

33.2-1803

and

33.2-1819

]. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

§ 62.1-129.1.
Employees; employment; personnel rules; health insurance; retirement plans.

Employees of the Authority shall be employed on such terms and conditions as established by the Authority. The Board of Commissioners of the Authority shall develop and adopt personnel rules, policies, and procedures to give its employees grievance rights, ensure that employment decisions shall be based upon the merit and fitness of applicants, and prohibit discrimination because of race, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.

The Authority shall issue a written notice to its employees regarding the Authority’s status. The date upon which such written notice is issued shall be referred to herein as the “option date.” Each employee may, by written request made within 180 days of the option date, elect not to become employed by the Authority. Any employee of the Virginia Port Authority who: (i) elects not to become employed by the Authority and who is not reemployed by any other department, institution, board, commission or agency of the Commonwealth; (ii) is not offered the opportunity to remain employed by the Authority; or (iii) is not offered a position with the Authority for which the employee is qualified or is offered a position that requires relocation or a reduction in salary, shall be eligible for the severance benefits conferred by the provisions of the Workforce Transition Act (§

2.2-3200

et seq.). Any employee who accepts employment with the Authority shall not be considered to be involuntarily separated from state employment and shall not be eligible for the severance benefits conferred by the Workforce Transition Act.

Any employee of the Authority who is a member of any plan providing health insurance coverage pursuant to Chapter 28 (§

2.2-2800

et seq.) of Title 2.2, shall continue to be a member of such health insurance plan under the same terms and conditions. Notwithstanding subsection A of §

2.2-2818

, the costs of providing health insurance coverage to such employees who elect to continue to be members of the state employees’ health insurance plan shall be paid by the Authority. Alternatively, an employee may elect to become a member of any health insurance plan established by the Authority. The Authority is authorized to: (i) establish a health insurance plan for the benefit of its employees and (ii) enter into agreements with the Department of Human Resource Management providing for the coverage of its employees under the state employees’ health insurance plan, provided that such agreement requires the Authority to pay the costs of providing health insurance coverage under such plan.

Any retired employee of the Authority shall be eligible to receive the health insurance credit set forth in §

51.1-1400

provided the retired employee meets the eligibility criteria set forth in that section.

Any Authority employee who is a member of the Virginia Retirement System or other retirement plan as authorized by Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1, shall continue to be a member of the Virginia Retirement System or other authorized retirement plan under the same terms and conditions. Alternatively, such employee may elect to become a member of the retirement program established by the Authority for the benefit of its employees pursuant to §

51.1-126.4

. The following rules shall apply:

The Authority shall collect and pay all employee and employer contributions to the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan for retirement and group life insurance in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of Title 51.1 for any employee who elects to remain a member of the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan.

Employees who elect to become members of the alternative retirement plan established by the Authority pursuant to §

51.1-126.4

shall be given full credit for their creditable service as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, and vesting and benefit accrual under the retirement plan. For any such employee, employment with the Authority shall be treated as employment with any nonparticipating employer for purposes of the Virginia Retirement System or other retirement plan authorized pursuant to Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1.

For employees who elect to become members of the alternative retirement plan established by the Authority, the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized plan shall transfer to the alternative retirement plan established by the Authority, assets equal to the actuarially determined present value of the accrued basic benefits as of the transfer date. For purposes hereof, the “basic benefits” means the benefits accrued under the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan based on creditable service and average final compensation as defined in §

51.1-124.3

. The actuarial present value shall be determined by using the same actuarial factors and assumptions used in determining the funding needs of the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan so that the transfer of assets to the alternative retirement plan established by the Authority will have no effect on the funded status and financial stability of the Virginia Retirement System or other such authorized retirement plan. The Authority shall reimburse the Virginia Retirement System for the cost of actuarial services necessary to determine the present value of the accrued basic benefit of employees who transfer to an Authority retirement plan.

The Authority may provide that employees of the Authority who are eligible to participate in the deferred compensation plan sponsored by the Authority shall be enrolled automatically in such plan, unless such employee elects, in a manner prescribed by the Board, not to participate. The amount of the deferral under the automatic enrollment and the group of employees to which the automatic enrollment shall apply shall be set by the Board; provided however, that such employees are provided the opportunity to increase or decrease the amount of the deferral in accordance with the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

History.

1997, c. 232; 2000, cc. 66, 657; 2008, cc. 325, 621; 2020, c. 1137.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, cc. 66 and 657, cl. 2 provides: “That wherever in the Code of Virginia the term ‘Department of Personnel and Training’ is used, it shall be deemed to mean the ‘Department of Human Resource Management.’ ”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by cc. 66 and 657 are identical, and substituted “Department of Human Resource Management” for “Department of Personnel and Training” in the last sentence of subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 325 and 621 are identical, and added subdivision E 4.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137 inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in the last sentence of subsection A.

§ 62.1-129.2.
Trust for postemployment benefits authorized; administration.

The Authority is hereby authorized to establish and maintain a trust or equivalent arrangement for the purpose of accumulating and investing assets to fund postemployment benefits other than pensions, as defined herein. Such trust or equivalent arrangement shall be irrevocable; the assets of such trust or similar arrangement shall be dedicated to providing benefits to retirees and their beneficiaries in accordance with the terms of the plan or programs providing postemployment benefits other than pensions; and the assets of such trust or equivalent arrangement shall be exempt from taxation and execution, attachment, garnishment or any other process against the Authority or a retiree or beneficiary. The funds of the trust or similar arrangement shall be deemed separate, and independent trust funds shall be segregated from all other funds of the Authority, and shall be invested and administered solely in the interests of the active or former employees (and their dependents or beneficiaries) entitled to postemployment benefits other than pensions covered by the Fund.

The Authority may make appropriations to any such trust or equivalent arrangement, and the Authority may require active and former employees covered by a postemployment benefit program to contribute to the trust or equivalent arrangement through payments or deductions from their wages, salaries, or pensions.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to inhibit the Authority’s right to revise or discontinue its plans or programs providing such postemployment benefits other than pensions for its active and former officers and employees as it may deem necessary. If all plans or programs providing such postemployment benefits other than pensions for which the trust or equivalent arrangement is established are repealed or terminated by the Authority, then there shall be no continuing responsibility for the Authority to continue to make appropriations to such trust or equivalent arrangement, and the assets of such trust or equivalent arrangement shall be used to provide any benefits continuing to be due to active or former employees (and their dependents or beneficiaries) under such plans or programs. If there are no active or former employees (or dependents or beneficiaries) due a benefit under any plan or program providing such postemployment benefits other than pensions for which the trust or equivalent arrangement was established, then any remaining assets may revert to the Authority.

Postemployment benefits other than pensions shall be defined by the Authority pursuant to applicable accounting standards and law. Such benefits may include, but are not limited to, medical, prescription drug, dental, vision, hearing, life or accident insurance (not provided through a pension plan), long-term care benefits, long-term disability benefits (not covered under a pension plan) provided to individuals who have terminated their service and to the dependents of such individuals, and may be provided by purchasing insurance, by a program of self-insurance, or by a combination of both. However, postemployment benefits other than pensions shall not include defined benefit pension plans for retirees and eligible dependents of retirees, termination benefits or other pension benefits. Such postemployment benefits other than pensions may be provided to the officers and employees or to their dependents, estates, or designated beneficiaries. Any benefits arising from any postemployment benefits other than pension programs shall be clearly defined and strictly construed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the moneys and other property comprising the trust or equivalent arrangement established hereunder and the moneys or other properties comprising the retirement program established pursuant to §

51.1-126.4

shall be invested, reinvested and managed by the Authority or the trust company or bank having powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth who is selected by the Board to act as a trustee for the fund, with the care, skill, prudence and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of like character and with the same aims. Such investments shall be diversified so as to minimize the risk of large losses unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so. Such investments shall not be limited by Chapter 45 (§

2.2-4500

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

History.

2008, cc. 597, 622.

§ 62.1-130.
Powers and duties of Executive Director.

The Executive Director shall employ or retain such other agents or employees subordinate to the Executive Director as may be necessary, subject to the Board’s approval. The Executive Director shall also exercise such of the powers and duties relating to ports conferred upon the Board as may be delegated to him by the Board, including powers and duties involving the exercise of discretion. The Executive Director shall also exercise and perform such other powers and duties as may be lawfully delegated to him, and such powers and duties as may be conferred or imposed upon him by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.3; 1952, c. 61; 1954, c. 667; 1968, c. 659; 1981, c. 589.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995. —

The Governor, having supervisory authority over the Secretary of Transportation under subsection B of §

2.2-200

, may provide appropriate coordination and guidance as the Secretary of Transportation exercises his authority under subdivision 2 of § 56-573.1 [see now §

33.2-1819

] to determine whether to give final approval before the responsible public entity signs a comprehensive agreement. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

§ 62.1-131.
Office and branch offices; title to property.

The Authority shall, in the Hampton Roads Area, have and maintain its principal office, at which all of its records shall be kept, and from which its business shall be transacted. It may, if necessary, establish a branch office or offices within or without the Commonwealth or the United States. The title to all property of every kind belonging to the former Hampton Roads Port Commission or the former State Port Authority of Virginia or the former Division of Ports Department of Conservation and Development, shall be vested in the Commonwealth of Virginia for the Virginia Port Authority.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.4; 1952, c. 61; 1958, c. 174; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 171; 1981, c. 589.

§ 62.1-132.
Local authorities subordinate to Authority.

Any conflict between any authority granted to the several port cities and towns or other entities of this Commonwealth, or the exercise of that authority, and the exercise of the authority granted to the Board of Commissioners under this chapter shall be resolved in favor of the exercise of such authority by the Board of Commissioners.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-106.6; 1952, c. 61; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 171; 1981, c. 589.

Portsmouth Port and Industrial Commission.

See Acts 1978, c. 287, and Acts 2007, cc. 237 and 339, amending Acts 1954, c. 157.

§ 62.1-132.1.
General powers.

Except as provided in subsection B, the Authority is vested with the powers of a body corporate, including, without limitation, to:

Sue and be sued;

Make contracts;

Adopt and use a common seal, and alter such seal at its pleasure;

Procure insurance, participate in insurance plans, and provide self-insurance. The purchase of insurance, participation in an insurance plan, or the creation of a self-insurance plan by the Authority shall not be deemed a waiver or relinquishment of any sovereign immunity to which the Authority or its officers, directors, employees, or agents are otherwise entitled;

Develop policies and procedures generally applicable to the procurement of goods, services and construction based on competitive principles; and

Exercise all the powers that are conferred upon industrial development authorities created pursuant to Chapter 49 (§

15.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 15.2, except that the power to effect a change in ownership or operation of the Port of Virginia shall be subject to the provisions of §

62.1-132.19

.

Expenditures by the Authority for capital projects are restricted to projects located on real property that is owned, leased, or operated by the Virginia Port Authority, except those expenditures (i) as provided in §

62.1-132.13

or

62.1-132.14

, (ii) on grants to local government for financial assistance for port facilities as approved by the Board in policies posted on the Authority’s website, or (iii) to provide support for the types of projects eligible for funding under subsection A of §

33.2-1509

, subsection A of §

33.2-1600

, or §

33.2-1526.4

.

History.

1981, c. 589; 1997, c. 232; 2013, cc. 762, 794; 2015, c. 609; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 762 and 794, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall exercise all powers and authority granted to it pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

62.1-128

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia to ensure that all necessary and desirable changes, reforms, and reorganizations are promptly undertaken in order to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of operation of Virginia International Terminals, Inc., including but not limited to the elimination of duplicative and redundant services, personnel, and positions. The Authority shall report to the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly actions taken to implement this undertaking.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 762 and 794 are identical, and added subdivision 6 and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 609 inserted the subsection A designation and substituted “Except as provided in subsection B, the” for “The” in the first sentence; and added subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical and substituted “§

33.2-1526.4

” for “subsection A of §

33.2-1601

” in clause (iii) of subsection B.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 31.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995. —

The Governor, having supervisory authority over the Secretary of Transportation under subsection B of §

2.2-200

, may provide appropriate coordination and guidance as the Secretary of Transportation exercises his authority under subdivision 2 of § 56-573.1 [see now §

33.2-1819

] to determine whether to give final approval before the responsible public entity signs a comprehensive agreement. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

§ 62.1-132.2.
Bylaws and organization.

The Authority shall have the power to adopt, alter, and repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the manner in which its business shall be transacted and the manner in which the powers of the Authority shall be exercised and its duties performed. Such bylaws, rules, and regulations may provide for such committees and their functions as the Authority may deem necessary or expedient.

History.

1981, c. 589.

§ 62.1-132.3.
Stimulation of commerce.

It shall be the duty of the Authority, on behalf of the Commonwealth, to foster and stimulate the commerce of the ports of the Commonwealth and related facilities by serving as the United States Eastern Seaboard gateway for the global import and export of freight throughout the world, to promote the shipment of freight through the maritime and inland ports, to seek to secure necessary improvements of navigable tidal waters within the Commonwealth, and in general to perform any act or function that may be useful in developing, improving, or increasing the commerce, both foreign and domestic, of all maritime and inland ports of the Commonwealth and related facilities.

History.

1981, c. 589; 2013, cc. 762, 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 762 and 794, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Port Authority shall exercise all powers and authority granted to it pursuant to Chapter 10 (§

62.1-128

et seq.) of Title 62.1 of the Code of Virginia to ensure that all necessary and desirable changes, reforms, and reorganizations are promptly undertaken in order to ensure the effectiveness and efficiency of operation of Virginia International Terminals, Inc., including but not limited to the elimination of duplicative and redundant services, personnel, and positions. The Authority shall report to the 2014 Regular Session of the General Assembly actions taken to implement this undertaking.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 762 and 794 are identical, and rewrote the section, which formerly read: “It shall be the duty of the Authority, on behalf of the Commonwealth, to foster and stimulate the commerce of the ports of the Commonwealth, to promote the shipment of goods and cargoes through the ports, to seek to secure necessary improvements of navigable tidal waters within the Commonwealth, and in general to perform any act or function which may be useful in developing, improving, or increasing the commerce, both foreign and domestic, of the ports of the Commonwealth.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995. —

The Virginia Port Authority, pursuant to § 56-557 [see now §

33.2-1800

}, is the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 for any concession of Port facilities because the General Assembly has conferred on it alone the power to develop and/or operate Port facilities and, as a result, the Virginia Port Authority bears statutory responsibility to review and evaluate the proposals received by private entities for the concession of Port facilities, and to do so according to any guidelines adopted by it pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1 [see now §§

33.2-1803

and

33.2-1819

]. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012).

§ 62.1-132.3:1.
Port Opportunity Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund that is a subfund of the Commonwealth Port Fund, known as the Port Opportunity Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds appropriated for such purpose and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on its behalf shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Executive Director of the Virginia Port Authority or his designee. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes enumerated in subsection C.

If the Authority’s revenues from terminal operations during a fiscal year exceed its terminal operating expenditures for that year by at least five percent, the Authority shall request that the Treasurer transfer to the Port Opportunity Fund an amount of up to five percent of that year’s revenues from terminal operations, not to exceed $2 million, unless the Secretary of Transportation determines that such a transfer is not in the long-term interest of the Authority. Such determination shall be made in writing by the Secretary of Transportation to the Executive Director of the Authority. Requests to transfer such revenues shall be made by August 30 of the ensuing fiscal year.

Moneys in the Fund shall be used to fund the development and implementation of a national and international marketing program and to provide incentives, as prescribed by the Board of Commissioners, for expanding the use of Virginia Port Authority facilities for the import and export of containerized and noncontainerized cargoes.

The Authority shall develop, and the Board of Commissioners approve, guidelines governing the use of incentives that comply with applicable Virginia laws.

History.

2012, cc. 846, 849; 2016, c. 714.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the Secretary of Transportation, in conjunction with the Board of Commissioners of the Virginia Port Authority, shall evaluate whether the forecasted revenue and the planned operational and capital needs of the Virginia Port Authority for the next 10 years support (i) the deposits of funding into, and continuation of, the Port Opportunity Fund as required by §

62.1-132.3:1

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the continuation of the Port of Virginia Economic and Infrastructure Development Grant Fund and Program established pursuant to §

62.1-132.3:2

of the Code of Virginia. The Secretary of Transportation shall provide his recommendations regarding modifications to or elimination of such funds, programs, and deposits to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance no later than November 15, 2016.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 714, in subsection A, inserted the second sentence, in the third sentence, added “Expenditures and” and made a related change, and rewrote the former last sentence as the next-to-last and last sentences; rewrote subsection B, which formerly read: “If the Authority’s revenues from terminal operations during a fiscal year exceed its terminal operating expenditures for that year by at least five percent, the Authority shall request that the Treasurer transfer to the Port Opportunity Fund an amount equal to five percent of that year’s revenues from terminal operations. Such requests are to be made by August 30 of the ensuing fiscal year”; and substituted “Moneys in the Fund” for “Revenues in the Fund” at the beginning of subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.